Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1775.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1711-D of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding a definition to read:Section 1711-D. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this subarticle shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:1234567891011121314151617181920212223 * * *"Digital media company." A business that primarily creates, produces and distributes content in digital formats, consumed and accessed online or through digital devices.* * *Section 2. Section 1716-D(a) introductory paragraph, (b) and (f) of the act are amended and the section is amended by adding subsections to read:Section 1716-D. Limitations.(a) Cap.--Except for tax credits reissued under section 1716.1-D, in no case shall the aggregate amount of tax credits awarded in any fiscal year under this subarticle exceed [$100,000,000] $400,000,000. The department may, in its discretion, award in one fiscal year up to:* * *(b) Individual limitations.--The following shall apply:(1) Except as set forth in paragraph (1.1) [or], (1.2) or (1.3), the aggregate amount of film production tax credits awarded by the department under section 1712-D(d) to a taxpayer for a film may not exceed [25%]:(i) 30% of the qualified film production expenses to be incurred[.], if the qualified production expenses are less than $50,000,000; or(ii) 35% of the qualified film production expenses to be incurred, if the qualified production expenses equal or exceed $50,000,000.(1.1) In addition to the tax credit under paragraph (1), a taxpayer is eligible for a credit in the amount of 5% of the qualified film production expenses incurred by the taxpayer if the taxpayer:20250HB1775PN2183 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) films a feature film, television film or television series, which is intended as programming for a national audience; and(ii) films in a qualified production facility which meets the minimum stage filming requirements.(1.2) A qualified postproduction expense shall qualify for a 30% credit.(1.3) In addition to the tax credit under paragraph (1), a taxpayer is eligible for the following stackable credits, which may be combined:(i) In the amount of 5% of the qualified film production expenses incurred by the taxpayer if the taxpayer produces the film with employees, at least 60% of whom are residents of this Commonwealth.(ii) In the amount of 5% of the qualified film production expenses incurred by the taxpayer if the taxpayer displays the official Pennsylvania tourism logo in the end credits of, or the promotional materials for, the film.(iii) In the amount of 5% of the qualified film production expenses incurred by the taxpayer if the film is shot on location in any of the following counties: Armstrong County; Beaver County; Bedford County; Blair County; Butler County; Cambria County; Centre County; Clarion County; Clearfield County; Columbia County; Crawford County; Erie County; Fayette County; Fulton County; Greene County; Huntingdon County; Indiana County; Jefferson County; Juniata County; Lawrence County; Mercer County; Mifflin County; Montour County; Northumberland County; Schuylkill County; Snyder County; Somerset 20250HB1775PN2183 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 County; Union County; Venango County; Washington County; or Westmoreland County.(2) A taxpayer that has received a grant under 12 Pa.C.S. § 4106 (relating to approval) shall not be eligible for a film production tax credit under this act for the same film.( b.1 ) Base c redit i ncrease.-- (1) Projects with budgets under $50,000,000 shall receive a 30% tax credit on qualified expenditures.(2) Projects with budgets of at least $50,000,000 shall receive a 35% tax credit on qualified expenditures.(b.2) Program cap.--The aggregate amount of tax credits awarded in a fiscal year under this subarticle shall not exceed $400,000,000, with allocations managed by the Pennsylvania Film Office.* * *(e.1) Small production reserve.--Fifteen percent of the annual allocation under this subarticle, with a minimum of $60,000,000, shall be reserved for Pennsylvania-based production and digital media companies for projects with budgets of $5,000,000 or less. Individual projects under this subsection shall be eligible for tax credits starting at $150,000 in qualified expenditures.(f) If the total amount of tax credits reserved and allocated under subsection (e) is not awarded in a fiscal year, the amount not awarded shall be made available for use by taxpayers who are not Pennsylvania film producers or digital media companies.(g) Retention credit pilot expansion.--Effective January 1, 2026, a $10,000,000 pilot program is established to provide tax 20250HB1775PN2183 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 credits to creative professionals, including directors, animators, editors, post-supervisors and showrunners who commit to Pennsylvania-based film, television, digital media or streaming media projects for at least three years. Credits under this subsection shall be capped at $150,000 per individual annually. Eligible professionals must demonstrate multiyear engagement with Pennsylvania productions or postproduction residencies.Section 3. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1722-D. Audits.The Auditor General shall conduct an annual audit to verify that taxpayers that received tax credits under section 1716-D(b)(1), (1.2) and (1.3) complied with those provisions, as applicable.Section 4. Section 1757-D of the act is amended to read:Section 1757-D. Limitations.(a) Cap.--In no case shall the aggregate amount of tax credits awarded in a fiscal year under this subarticle exceed $1,000,000.(b) Individual limitations.--[The] (1) Except as set forth in paragraph (2), the aggregate amount of video game production tax credits awarded by the department under section 1753-D(d) to a taxpayer for a video game may not exceed 25% of the qualified video game production expenses to be incurred during each of the first four years that the video game production expenses are incurred and 10% for each year thereafter that the video game production expenses are incurred.(2) In addition to the tax credit under paragraph (1), a taxpayer is eligible for a credit in the amount of 5% of the 20250HB1775PN2183 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 qualified video game production expenses incurred by the taxpayer if the taxpayer develops a video game project involving coding, art, sound design or narrative development, in this Commonwealth.Section 5. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 1762-D. Formal review by department.The department shall, in consultation with a Statewide organization that represents interactive entertainment, conduct a formal review to assess the additional needs and scalability of tax credits similar to the tax credit under section 1757-D(b)(2) for gaming and immersive media.Section 6. Article XVII-D of the act is amended by adding subarticles to read:SUBARTICLE FCREATIVE PROFESSIONALS TAX CREDITSection 1791-D. Scope of subarticle.This subarticle relates to creative professionals tax credits.Section 1792-D. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this subarticle shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Creative professional." An individual who is employed as a director, animator, editor, post-supervisor, showrunner or any other creative role in film, television, digital media or streaming media productions in this Commonwealth."Multiyear production." A series of separate and distinct films that are produced by the same taxpayer in this Commonwealth over a period of no more than three years from the time of application.20250HB1775PN2183 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Qualified tax liability." The liability for taxes imposed under Article III."Start date." The first day of principal production of a film in this Commonwealth."Tax credit." The creative professional tax credit provided under this subarticle."Taxpayer." A creative professional subject to tax under Article III.Section 1793-D. Credit.(a) Application.--A taxpayer may apply to the department for a tax credit under this section. The application shall be on the form required by the department.(b) Review and approval.--The department shall review and approve or disapprove applications submitted under this subarticle in the order in which they are received. Upon determining that the taxpayer has incurred or will incur qualified tax liability, the department may approve the taxpayer for a tax credit.(c) Contract.--If the department approves the taxpayer's application under subsection (b), the department and the taxpayer shall enter into a contract containing the following:(1) An itemized list of multiyear productions.(2) With respect to a contract entered into prior to completion of production, a commitment by the taxpayer to engage in the multiyear productions as itemized.(3) The principal production start date.(4) Any other information the department deems appropriate.(c.1) Prohibition.--A tax credit may not be awarded for fiscal years prior to fiscal year 2025-2026.20250HB1775PN2183 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (d) Certificate.--Upon execution of the contract required by subsection (c), the department shall award the taxpayer a creative professional tax credit and issue the taxpayer a creative professional tax credit certificate.Section 1794-D. Creative professionals tax credits.Beginning July 1, 2026, a taxpayer may claim a tax credit against the qualified tax liability of the taxpayer.Section 1795-D. Carryover, carryback and assignment of credit.(a) General rule.--If the taxpayer cannot use the entire amount of the tax credit for the taxable year in which the tax credit is first approved, the excess may be carried over to succeeding taxable years and used as a credit against the qualified tax liability of the taxpayer for those taxable years. Each time the tax credit is carried over to a succeeding taxable year, it shall be reduced by the amount that was used as a credit during the immediately preceding taxable year. The tax credit may be carried over and applied to succeeding taxable years for no more than three taxable years following the first taxable year for which the taxpayer was entitled to claim the tax credit.(b) Application.--A tax credit approved by the department in a taxable year first shall be applied against the taxpayer's qualified tax liability for the current taxable year as of the date on which the tax credit was approved before the tax credit can be applied against any tax liability under subsection (a).(c) No carryback or refund.--A taxpayer is not entitled to carry back or obtain a refund of all or any portion of an unused tax credit granted to the taxpayer under this subarticle.(d) (Reserved).(e) Sale or assignment prohibited.--A taxpayer may not sell 20250HB1775PN2183 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or assign, in whole or in part, a tax credit granted to the taxpayer under this subarticle.Section 1796-D. Limitations.(a) Cap.--In no case shall the aggregate amount of tax credits awarded in a fiscal year under this subarticle exceed $20,000,000.(b) Individual limitations.--The aggregate amount of creative professional tax credits awarded by the department to a taxpayer may not exceed $150,000 in any taxable year.Section 1797-D. Penalty.A taxpayer that claims a tax credit and breaches the contract entered into in section 1793-D(c) shall repay to the Commonwealth the amount of the creative professional tax credit claimed under this subarticle.SUBARTICLE GMISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONSSection 1799.1-D. Duties of department.The department shall:(1) In consultation with a film or gaming production company based in this Commonwealth and not later than April 1, 2026, develop and implement a dashboard on a publicly accessible Internet website. The dashboard shall track tax credits issued under this article, jobs created and economic benefits to this Commonwealth as a result of the tax credits issued under this article and usage of tax credits reserved under section 1716-D(e).(2) Not later than December 31, 2033, prepare and submit a report to the General Assembly. The report shall consist of an analysis of the economic impact of the tax credits awarded under this article.20250HB1775PN2183 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (3) Ensure that all approved tax credits under this article are disbursed or returned within a single calendar year of eligibility certification.Section 7. This act shall apply to taxable years commencing on or after December 31, 2025.Section 8. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1775PN2183 - 10 - 123456